Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 163A.100 is amended to read:
163A.100. The State Board of  Parole and Post-Prison Supervision shall, in consultation with
community corrections  agencies, adopt by rule a sex offender risk assessment methodology for use
in classifying sex offenders.  The methodology may consider  exclusively the risk the sex
offender presented at the time  the sex offender was released from custody, sentenced or
otherwise discharged from the jurisdiction of a court of this state, or another  United States
court, for the crime or act for which the sex offender is required to report.  Application of the
risk assessment methodology to a sex offender must result in placing the sex offender in one of  the
following  levels:
(1) A level  one sex offender who presents , or presented at the time of release, sentencing
or discharge, the lowest risk of reoffending and requires a limited range of notification.
(2) A level two sex offender who presents , or presented at the  time of release, sentencing
or discharge, a moderate risk of reoffending and requires a moderate range of notification.
(3) A level three sex offender who presents , or presented at the time  of release, sentencing
or discharge, the highest risk of reoffending and requires the widest range of notification.
SECTION 2.  ORS 163A.105 is amended to read:
163A.105. (1) When  a person convicted of a crime described in ORS 163.355 to 163.427 is sen-
tenced to a term of imprisonment in  a Department of Corrections institution for that crime, the
State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision shall assess the person utilizing  the risk assess-
ment methodology described in ORS 163A.100. The board shall apply the results  of the assessment
to place the person in one of the levels described in ORS 163A.100 before the person is released from
custody.
(2) When a person convicted of a sex crime is sentenced to a term of incarceration in  a jail, or
is discharged,  released or placed on probation by the court, the supervisory authority as defined in
ORS 144.087 shall assess  the person utilizing the risk assessment methodology described in ORS
163A.100 and apply the results  of the assessment to place the person in one of the levels described
in ORS 163A.100 no later than 90  days after the person is released from jail or discharged, released
or placed on probation by the court.
(3)(a) When a person is found guilty except for insanity  of a sex crime, the Psychiatric Security
Review  Board  shall assess the person utilizing the risk assessment methodology described in ORS
Enrolled Senate Bill 1122 (SB 1122-A) Page 1
163A.100 and apply the results  of the assessment to place the person in one of the levels described
in ORS 163A.100 no later than 90 days after the person is:
(A) Placed on conditional release by the Psychiatric Security Review Board;
(B) Discharged from the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board;
(C) Placed on conditional release by the court pursuant to ORS 161.327; or
(D) Discharged by the court pursuant to ORS 161.329.
(b) If the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision previously completed a risk as-
sessment and assigned  a classification level described in ORS 163A.100 for a person described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the  Psychiatric Security Review Board need not complete a reas-
sessment for an initial classification.
(c) The court shall notify the Psychiatric Security Review  Board when the court conditionally
releases or discharges a person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) The Psychiatric Security Review Board shall notify  the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision no later than seven days after the Psychiatric Security  Review Board condi-
tionally releases or discharges  a person who has a prior sex crime conviction that obligates the
person to report as a sex offender, unless the person has also been found guilty except for  insanity
of a sex crime that obligates the person to report as a sex offender.
(4)(a) Within 90 days after receiving notice  of a person’s obligation to report in this state from
the Department of State Police, the  State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision shall assess
the person utilizing the risk assessment methodology  described in ORS 163A.100 and apply the re-
sults of the assessment to place the person in one of the levels described in ORS  163A.100 if the
person has been convicted in another United States court of a crime:
(A) That would constitute a sex crime if committed in this state; or
(B) For which the person would  have to register as a sex offender in that court’s jurisdiction,
or as required under federal law, regardless of whether the crime would constitute  a sex crime in
this state.
(b) If a person has been convicted of a sex crime and was sentenced to a term of imprisonment
in a Department of Corrections institution for that sex crime, but was not subjected to a  risk as-
sessment utilizing the risk assessment methodology described in ORS 163A.100  before release under
subsection (1) of this section, within 90 days after the person’s release  the State Board of Parole
and Post-Prison Supervision shall assess the person utilizing the risk  assessment methodology de-
scribed in ORS 163A.100  and apply the results of the assessment to place the person in one of the
levels described in ORS 163A.100.
(5) When the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision, the Psychiatric Security Review
Board or  a supervisory authority applies the results of a risk assessment to place a person in one
of the  levels described in ORS 163A.100, the agency shall notify the Department of State Police of
the results of the risk assessment within three business days after  the agency’s classification. Upon
receipt, the Department of State Police shall enter the results of the  risk assessment into the Law
Enforcement Data System.
(6) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision, the Psychiatric Security Review
Board or a supervisory authority may reassess or reclassify a person placed in one  of the levels
described in ORS 163A.100 under this section if :
(a) The classifying board or authority determines that a factual mistake  caused an erroneous
assessment or classification ; or
(b) The person has committed a sexually motivated rule violation while in  custody, has
committed a sexually motivated violation of a condition of probation,  parole or post-prison
supervision or has been arrested for or charged with a sex crime .
(7)(a) A person classified under this section as a level two or level three sex  offender as de-
scribed in ORS  163A.100 may petition the classifying board or authority for review. Except for good
cause shown, the petition may be filed no later than 60 days after  the notice of the classification is
provided to the person or, if the notice is mailed, no later than 60 days after the notice is sent.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1122 (SB 1122-A) Page 2
(b) When good cause is shown, the time for filing  a petition under this subsection may not be
extended more than 60 days beyond  the date of the person’s next annual report under ORS 163A.010,
163A.015 or 163A.020.
(c) Upon receipt of a petition described in this subsection, the classifying board or  authority
shall afford the  person an opportunity to be heard as to all factual questions related to the classi-
fication.
(d) After providing the person with notice and an  opportunity to be heard in accordance with
this subsection, the  board or authority shall classify the person in accordance with the classifica-
tions described in ORS 163A.100, based on all of the information available to the  classifying board
or authority.
(e) As used  in this subsection, “good cause” means that, due to a person’s transience, lack of
housing, ongoing mental health concerns or other similar circumstances,  a notice mailed to the
person under paragraph (a) of this subsection was not received by the person.
(8)(a) If the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision, the  Psychiatric Security Review
Board or a supervisory authority does not classify a person under ORS 163A.100 because  the person
has failed or refused to participate in a sex offender risk assessment as directed  by the board or
authority, the classifying  board or authority shall classify the person as a level three sex offender
under ORS 163A.100 (3).
(b) If a person classified as a level three sex offender under this subsection notifies the classi-
fying board or authority  of the willingness to participate in a sex offender risk assessment, the
classifying board or authority shall  perform the assessment and classify the person in one of the
levels described in ORS 163A.100.
(9) The State Board  of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision and the Psychiatric Security Review
Board may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 163A.100 by section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to sex
offenders released from custody, sentenced or otherwise discharged  from the jurisdiction of
a court of this state, or another United States court, for the crime or act for which  the sex
offender is required to report, before, on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. The State Board of Parole and  Post-Prison Supervision may reassess and
reclassify, in accordance with the amendments to ORS 163A.100 by section 1 of  this 2025 Act,
any sex offender who was previously assessed and classified on or after July 10, 2024.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1122 (SB 1122-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate April 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1122 (SB 1122-A) Page 4